Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-8805
Stem Cell Research
Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Stem
Cell Research Cash Fund is created. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska
Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) Money credited to the Stem Cell Research Cash Fund shall
be used to provide a dollar-for-dollar match, up to five hundred thousand
dollars per fiscal year, of funds received by institutions or researchers
from sources other than funds provided by the State of Nebraska for nonembryonic
stem cell research. Such matching funds shall be awarded through the grant
process established pursuant to section 71-8804. No single institution or
researcher shall receive more than seventy percent of the funds available
for distribution under this section on an annual basis.

(3) Up to three percent of the funds credited to the Stem
Cell Research Cash Fund shall be available to the Division of Public Health
of the Department of Health and Human Services for administrative costs, including
stipends and reimbursements pursuant to section 71-8803.

Laws 2008, LB606, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB316, § 20;

Laws 2012, LB969, § 10.
July 1, 2012
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.